Maryland, session 2025, HB0409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–206.
(a) (1) The Board may employ:
(i) one part–time deputy chief inspector at an annual salary of
[$9,000] $18,000; and
(ii) 18 part–time inspectors at an annual salary of $7,000 each.
(2) Each inspector shall receive a monthly expense allowance of $300,
subject to the approval of the Executive Director.
– 1 –

Ch. 816 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) An inspector:
(1) has all the powers of a peace officer or sheriff in the State arising out of
or relating to the enforcement of this article;
(2) may serve a summons under § 11–2604 of this title; and
(3) may issue a civil citation under § 11–2605 of this title.
(c) An inspector shall take the oath required by Article I, § 9 of the Maryland
Constitution.
(d) (1) An inspector shall provide a penalty bond of $2,000 to the Board and
the County Council jointly on the condition that the inspector faithfully perform the duties
of office.
(2) The county shall pay the cost of the bond.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –